Wyoming statutes. Title 5 Courts
Article 1. In General

§ 5-6-101.
Created and established.

There is hereby created
and established in each of the incorporated cities or towns in the
state of Wyoming, whether incorporated or existing under a special
charter or a general act, and whether now in existence or hereafter
incorporated under the laws of the state, a municipal court for the
trial of all offenses arising under ordinances of said incorporated
city or town, as the case may be.

History.

Laws 1905, ch. 27, § 1; 1909, ch. 88, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 949; C.S. 1920, § 1175; R.S. 1931, § 22-1301; C.S. 1945, § 29-1801; W.S. 1957, § 5-115.

Cross references. —

As to power of cities and towns to enforce obedience of ordinances with fines and penalties, see § 15-1-103(a)(xli).

Provisions in special charter not repealed. —

Provision of the special charter of the city of Cheyenne was not amended by this section and other sections in this article in regard to appeals from police court. Stutsman v. Cheyenne, 18 Wyo. 499, 113 P. 322,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1911).

Applied

in

Nollsch v. City of Rock Springs, 724 P.2d 447,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 603

(Wyo. 1986).

Quoted

in

Lapp v. City of Worland, 612 P.2d 868,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 283

(Wyo. 1980).

Cited

in

City of Sheridan v. Cadle, 24 Wyo. 293, 157 P. 892,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(1916).

§ 5-6-102.
Municipal judges; number; jurisdiction.

Judges of municipal courts
are termed municipal judges. The number of municipal judges shall
be prescribed by ordinance of each incorporated city or town. The
jurisdiction of municipal judges shall be as prescribed either by
special charter of the incorporated city or town, by general law of
the incorporated city or town, or by general law of the state.

History.

Laws 1905, ch. 27, § 2; C.S. 1910, § 950; C.S. 1920, § 1176; R.S. 1931, § 22-1302; C.S. 1945, § 29-1802; W.S. 1957, § 5-116; Laws 1981, ch. 101, § 1.

Applied

in

Nollsch v. City of Rock Springs, 724 P.2d 447,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 603

(Wyo. 1986); Dawson v. City of Casper, 731 P.2d 1186,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 389

(Wyo. 1987).

Cited

in

Stutsman v. City of Cheyenne, 18 Wyo. 499, 113 P. 322,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(1911).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Criminal jurisdiction of municipal or other local court, 102 ALR5th 525.

§ 5-6-103.
Appointment of municipal judges; qualifications.

Municipal judges shall
be appointed by the mayor with the consent of the council, and shall
be qualified electors of the state unless otherwise provided by ordinance.

History.

Laws 1905, ch. 27, § 3; C.S. 1910, § 951; C.S. 1920, § 1177; R.S. 1931, § 22-1303; C.S. 1945, § 29-1803; W.S. 1957, § 5-117; Laws 1971, ch. 214, § 27; 1977, ch. 9, § 1; 1981, ch. 101, § 1.

Cross references. —

For definition of “qualified elector,” see § 22-1-102(a)(x).

§ 5-6-104.
Term of office; compensation.

The terms of municipal
judges shall be the same as the terms of other appointed officers
of the city or town, unless earlier removed for good cause as provided
by law. Compensation shall be prescribed by ordinance of the city
or town.

History.

Laws 1905, ch. 27, § 5; C.S. 1910, § 953; C.S. 1920, § 1179; R.S. 1931, § 22-1305; C.S. 1945, § 29-1806; W.S. 1957, § 5-118; Laws 1981, ch. 101, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to term of office of appointed officers in first-class cities, see §

15-3-204

.

As to election and removal of officers under commission form of government, see §

15-4-104

.

As to term of office of appointive officers under manager form of government, see §

15-4-202

.

Due process right to pretermination notice and hearing. —

A municipal judge has an identifiable property right in his office and, therefore, has a federal constitutional right to due process of law that demands notice of an action for his discharge and a hearing prior to termination of his appointment to the office. Art. 1, § 6, Wyo. Const., affords equivalent protection in such a case. Town of Upton v. Whisler, 824 P.2d 545,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1992).

§ 5-6-105.
Bond.

A municipal judge shall
give a bond to the municipality for which he is appointed in an amount
provided by ordinance of the city or town. The bond shall be conditioned
on the performance of his duties in accordance with law and ordinance
of the city including the duty to turn over to the parties entitled
or as prescribed by ordinance of the city all monies collected by
him by virtue of his office.

History.

Laws 1905, ch. 27, § 6; C.S. 1910, § 954; C.S. 1920, § 1180; R.S. 1931, § 22-1306; C.S. 1945, § 29-1807; W.S. 1957, § 5-119; Laws 1981, ch. 101, § 1.

§ 5-6-106.
Procedure
generally; additional rules may be provided by ordinance; appeals.

The procedure of municipal
courts shall conform to the procedure provided by law and rules of
procedure for courts of limited jurisdiction. The incorporated city
or town may by ordinance provide any additional rules of procedure
found necessary for the proper conduct of municipal courts, provided
these rules do not conflict with the general laws of the state. Appeals
to the district court shall be allowed in all cases as now provided
by law for appeals from circuit courts.

History.

Laws 1905, ch. 27, § 4; C.S. 1910, § 952; C.S. 1920, § 1178; R.S. 1931, § 22-1304; C.S. 1945, § 29-1804; W.S. 1957, § 5-120; Laws 1981, ch. 101, § 1; 2008, ch. 27, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to appeals to district court from decisions of justices of the peace in civil actions, see §

1-21-403

.

As to appeals generally, see Rules 1 through 3, 7, 10 and 12, W.R.A.P.

The 2008 amendment

substituted “circuit courts” for “justices of the peace” in the final sentence.

Laws 2008, ch. 27, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2008.

Defendant in criminal
case can appeal under §

5-6-107

,

irrespective of provisions
for appeal from a police justice in
§

5-6-203

and irrespective of other appeal provisions contained
in this section.
Badley v. Sheridan, 440 P.2d 516,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1968) (but see, now, Rule 29, W.R. Cr. P.J.C.).

District court has jurisdiction of violation of ordinance.
—

The district court has jurisdiction on an appeal from a municipal court for violation of an ordinance. City of Sheridan v. Cadle, 24 Wyo. 293, 157 P. 892,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1916).

Complaint must be filed in district court. —

Where defendant was tried in district court on appeal from municipal court without sworn complaint being filed in district court against him, he was improperly tried. Torrington v. Taylor, 59 Wyo. 109, 137 P.2d 621,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1943).

Applied

in

Swisse v. City of Sheridan, 561 P.2d 712,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 239

(Wyo. 1977).

Quoted

in

Lapp v. City of Worland, 612 P.2d 868,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 283

(Wyo. 1980).

Stated

in

Cisneros v. City of Casper, 479 P.2d 198,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 190

(Wyo. 1971).

Cited

in

Stutsman v. City of Cheyenne, 18 Wyo. 499, 113 P. 322,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(1911); Stroup v. City of Sheridan, 392 P.2d 517,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo. 1964); City of Laramie v. Hysong, 808 P.2d 199,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1991).

§ 5-6-107.
Appeals
to district court in certain cities or towns.

In addition to all other
methods heretofore provided by law, an appeal from the judgment or
sentence of a municipal court in any city or town operating under
a special charter or commission, commission manager or manager form
of government, may be taken to the district court in the same manner
as is now provided by law for appeals from circuit courts in criminal
cases, and shall be dealt with by the courts as criminal cases.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 115, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 29-1805; W.S. 1957, § 5-121; Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “municipal court” for “police justice,” and “circuit” for “justice.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Appeal irrespective of §§

5-6-106

and

5-6-203

. —

A defendant in a criminal case can appeal under the provisions of this section, irrespective of provisions for appeal from a police justice in §

5-6-203

and irrespective of other appeal provisions contained in §

5-6-106

.Badley v. City of Sheridan, 440 P.2d 516,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1968).

Appeal from sentence for contempt. —

This section authorizes an appeal from a sentence for contempt imposed by a police justice to the district court. Badley v. City of Sheridan, 440 P.2d 516,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1968).

In order for the district court to determine whether the acts complained of can constitute a contempt, it should require the police justice to set forth the particular circumstances of the offense, as required for justices of the peace in §

1-21-905

.Badley v. City of Sheridan, 440 P.2d 516,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1968).

Defendant is entitled to jury trial when he has appealed to district court

from a judgment in the police court. State ex rel. Suchta v. District Court, 74 Wyo. 48, 283 P.2d 1023,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(1955).

As case is on same footing as state criminal cases. —

By the term “criminal cases” is meant cases in violation of the laws of the state. When a case of violation of an ordinance reaches the district court on appeal, the violation of such ordinance is considered to be on the same footing as a crime under the criminal laws of the state and must, under this section, be tried in the same manner. Trials under the criminal law of this state are jury trials not only when the case originates in the district court, but also when it originates in a justice court and is then appealed, for on the appeal the trial is de novo. State ex rel. Suchta v. District Court, 74 Wyo. 48, 283 P.2d 1023,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(1955).

Applied

in

Stroup v. City of Sheridan, 392 P.2d 517,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo. 1964).

Quoted

in

Lapp v. City of Worland, 612 P.2d 868,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 283

(Wyo. 1980).

Cited

in

Shafsky v. City of Casper, 487 P.2d 468,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 236

(Wyo. 1971); City of Laramie v. Hysong, 808 P.2d 199,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1991).

§ 5-6-108.
Costs.

Each city or town in the state of Wyoming may prescribe by ordinance such costs in all trials before municipal courts as may be necessary or deemed expedient. However, the costs shall not exceed ten dollars ($10.00). All costs collected shall be turned into the treasury of the city or town. By ordinance a city or town may prescribe:

A court automation fee of forty dollars ($40.00) as a cost to be paid by every person guilty of a violation of a city or town ordinance;

An indigent civil legal services fee of ten dollars ($10.00) as a cost to be paid by every person guilty of a violation of a city or town ordinance.

History.

Laws 1905, ch. 27, § 7; C.S. 1910, § 955; C.S. 1920, § 1181; R.S. 1931, § 22-1307; C.S. 1945, § 29-1808; W.S. 1957, § 5-122; Laws 1973, ch. 211, § 1; 2000, ch. 25, § 2; 2010, ch. 109, § 2; 2017 ch. 105, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2020 ch. 66, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, designated the existing provisions as (a) and (a)(i); added (a)(ii); and made related changes.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(i), substituted “twenty-five dollars ($25.00)” for “ten dollars ($10.00).”

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(i), substituted “forty dollars ($40.00)” for “twenty-five dollars ($25.00).”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 5-6-109.
Postponement of trial for violation of city ordinance; recognizance
generally.

If a person charged with
a violation of a city ordinance is held to appear for examination
or trial before a municipal judge, the judge may postpone the trial
of the case to a certain day. The judge may require the defendant
to enter into a recognizance with sufficient sureties conditioned
that he will appear before the judge at the time and place appointed
to answer the complaint alleged against him.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 128, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 5-122.1; Laws 1981, ch. 101, § 1.

§ 5-6-110.
Postponement of trial for violation of city ordinance; sureties or
deposit may be required; breach of recognizance; procedure where offense
not cognizable before judge.

When a person is ordered
by the municipal judge to enter into a recognizance, he may at the
discretion of the municipal judge be permitted to sign his own recognizance,
furnish sureties or deposit in cash with the judge or his designee
the amount named in the bond. If the person so recognized fails to
appear and comply with all of the requirements of the bond, the judge
having cognizance shall, if there are no mitigating circumstances,
declare the bond forfeited and order the cash deposited into the general
fund of the treasury of the city. If it appears to the judge the accused
is triable for an offense not cognizable before the judge, the judge
shall halt further proceedings and proceed as in other cases exclusively
cognizable before the district court.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 128, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 5-122.2; Laws 1981, ch. 101, § 1.

§ 5-6-111.
Execution
on judgments.

Upon assessment of any
fine and costs for the conviction of a violation of any ordinance
of a city or town, judgment shall be entered against the defendant
in favor of the city or town. If the judgment is not paid within ninety
(90) days from the date of the judgment the city or town may collect
judgment by execution in circuit court in the manner provided by law.
Except as otherwise provided by law all amounts recovered pursuant
to this section shall be deposited with the city or town treasurer,
used for the benefit of the city or town, and credited against the
fine and reasonable costs of collection.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 11, § 1; 2000, ch. 24, § 4; 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

deleted “or justice of the peace court” following “execution in circuit court.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

§ 5-6-112.
Detention
of juvenile offenders.

No minor charged with violating a municipal ordinance defined as a status offense under subsection (b) of this section shall be detained in a jail.

As used in W.S.

5-6-112

and

5-6-113

:

“Juvenile detention facility” means any facility which may legally and physically restrict and house a child, other than the Wyoming boys’ school, the Wyoming girls’ school, the Wyoming state hospital or other private or public psychiatric facility within the state of Wyoming. “Juvenile detention facility” does not include any residential treatment facility which is operated for the primary purpose of providing treatment to a child. A juvenile detention facility may be housed within an adult jail or correction facility if the facility otherwise meets the requirements of state law;

“Minor” means an individual who is under the age of eighteen (18) years;

“Status offense” means an offense which, if committed by an adult, would not constitute an act punishable as a criminal offense by the laws of this state or a violation of a municipal ordinance, but does not include a violation of W.S. 12-6-101(b) or (c) or any similar municipal ordinance;

“Hardware secure juvenile detention facility” means a facility used for the detention of minors that is characterized by locks on the doors and other restrictive hardware designed to restrict the movement of the minors and protect public safety;

“Shelter care” means as defined in W.S. 14-6-201(a)(xxii);

“Staff secure juvenile detention facility” means a facility used for the detention of minors that is characterized by a trained staff to supervise the movement and activities of detained minors at the facility, without the additional use of hardware secure equipment.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 210, § 1; 1995, ch. 122, § 2; ch. 150, § 1; 1996, ch. 106, § 1; 1997, ch. 149, § 1; 1998, ch. 7, § 1; 2010, ch. 22, § 1; ch. 69, § 203; 2016 ch. 56, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2010 amendments. —

The first 2010 amendment, by ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2010, added (b)(iv) through (b)(vi).

The second 2010 amendment, by ch. 69, § 203, effective July 1, 2010, in (a), deleted “Effective July 1, 1995” at the beginning.

While neither
amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in
this section as set out above.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, added second sentence in (b)(i).

Appropriations. —

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 205, as amended by Laws 2005, ch. 191, § 2, appropriates $400,000 for fiscal year 2005-2006, to be expended by the department of education to continue the provision of educational programs and services to children placed in juvenile detention facilities commencing the day following the detention hearing, as originally authorized under and subject to conditions and limitations prescribed by Laws 2004, ch. 111, § 3(b). Unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining from this appropriation existing on June 30, 2005 are to be reappropriated and expended only for these purposes.

Laws 2005, ch. 191, § 400, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2005.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Treatment, under Federal Juvenile Delinquency Act (18 USCS §§ 5031-5042), of juvenile alleged to have violated law of United States, 137 ALR Fed 481.

§ 5-6-113.
Incarceration
of juvenile offenders.

No minor convicted of a status offense shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment.

A minor convicted of a misdemeanor or of violating a municipal ordinance, other than a status offense, for which a term of imprisonment is authorized, shall only be imprisoned in a juvenile detention facility.

Except for an alleged delinquent minor who is released to the custody of the minor’s parent, guardian or custodian, with verbal counsel, warning or a written promise to appear in court, the person taking the minor into custody shall ensure that a juvenile detention risk assessment shall be promptly performed, using a uniform assessment instrument designed by the county sheriffs. If the risk assessment finds that the minor is a serious risk to himself or to the safety of others, the minor may be:

Placed in a hardware secure juvenile detention facility;

Transferred to a medical facility if the minor is believed to be suffering from a serious physical or mental illness that requires prompt diagnosis or treatment;

If the minor is not held pursuant to paragraph (i) of this subsection, placed in shelter care or a staff secure juvenile detention facility, or released to a parent, guardian or other custodian who can provide supervision and care for the minor pending the minor’s appearance in court. If no space is available in shelter care or a staff secure juvenile detention facility, the minor may be held in a hardware secure juvenile detention facility.

A minor under the age of eleven (11) years shall not be held in a hardware secure juvenile detention facility. If the minor under the age of eleven (11) years poses a substantial risk of harm to himself or others, a peace officer may detain and transport the minor for an emergency mental health evaluation.

If a minor is taken into custody and is not released to the minor’s parent, guardian or custodian, the person taking the minor into custody shall give notice thereof to the minor’s parent, guardian or custodian as soon as possible, and in no case later than twenty-four (24) hours after taking the minor into custody.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 210, § 1; 1995, ch. 150, § 1; 2010, ch. 22, § 1; ch. 69, § 203.

The 2010 amendments. —

The first 2010 amendment, by ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2010, added (c) through (e).

The second 2010 amendment, by ch. 69, § 203, effective July 1, 2010, in (a), deleted “Effective July 1, 1995” at the beginning.

While neither
amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in
this section as set out above.

§ 5-6-114.
Special probation for minor defendants.

As a condition of probation
or suspension of sentence, the court may require a defendant who is
a minor to successfully complete a juvenile service program offered under the Community Juvenile Services Act.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 181, § 1; 2013 ch. 20, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment

,
effective July 1, 2013, deleted “by a community juvenile services board” following “program offered”.

§ 5-6-115.
Process extends throughout the state.

A municipal judge may
issue a statewide bench warrant for violation of a municipal ordinance
which contains the same elements as a comparable state statute. The
municipality in which the court issuing the statewide bench warrant
exists is responsible for all costs incurred in executing the warrant,
including costs of housing and transporting a person arrested under
the warrant.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 29, § 1.

§
5-6-116.
Suspension of fines on conditions.

Notwithstanding W.S.

7-13-302

through

7-13-305

, when imposing a fine for breach of an ordinance that is punishable by fine only, a municipal judge may suspend all or part of the fine for a specified period, not to exceed six (6) months, during which the defendant must meet specified conditions. The conditions imposed shall only require the defendant to conform his conduct to the requirements of the ordinance and shall not prohibit lawful conduct. When suspending a fine, a municipal judge must:

Specify the amount of the fine to be suspended; and

Specify the conditions the defendant must meet to avoid imposition of the suspended portion of the fine, including the date by which the conditions must be met.

If a defendant fails to comply with the conditions specified, the municipality may commence proceedings to impose the suspended portion of the fine during the period of suspension or within thirty (30) days thereafter. If after notice and a hearing the court determines the defendant failed to comply with the conditions of the suspended fine, the court may proceed to deal with the case as if no suspension of fine had been ordered.

History.

2018 ch. 67, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

Editor’s notes. —

Laws 2018, ch. 67, § 2, provides: "This act applies only to violations of ordinances that occur on or after the effective date of this act."

Effective date. —

Laws 2018,
ch. 67, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2018.